Washington statutes.
RCW 19.16.290

Board—Initial members—Terms—Oath—Removal.

The initial members of the board shall be named by the governor within thirty days after January 1, 1972. At the first meeting of the board, the members appointed by the governor shall determine by lot the period of time from January 1, 1972, that each of them shall serve, one for one year; one for two years; one for three years; and one for four years. In the event of a vacancy on the board, the governor shall appoint a successor for the unexpired term.

Each member appointed by the governor shall qualify by taking the usual oath of a state officer, which shall be filed with the secretary of state, and each member shall hold office for the term of his or her appointment and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified.

Any member of the board other than the director or his or her designee may be removed by the governor for neglect of duty, misconduct, malfeasance, or misfeasance in office, after being given a written statement of the charges against him or her and sufficient opportunity to be heard thereon.

[ 2011 c 336 s 524; 1971 ex.s. c 253 s 20.]